Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 5700YC (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. STATE BOARD OF REGENTS ââ PERFORMANCE-BASED 1 FUNDING MODEL ââ REPORT. The state board of regents shall, 2 on or before the November 2026 meeting of the state board 3 of regents, submit a report to the general assembly and to 4 the governor that describes how the state board of regents 5 could establish a performance-based funding model for the 6 institutions of higher education governed by the state board of 7 regents. The performance-based funding model must include, at 8 a minimum, all of the following factors: 9 1. Graduation rates. 10 2. The number of degrees awarded in areas corresponding to 11 high-demand jobs in this state. 12 3. Post-graduation employment rates. 13 4. Post-graduation income. 14 5. The number of graduates who remain in this state after 15 graduation. 16